Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2599.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 6106(a) and (b)(11) and (13), 6109(a) and (b) and 6122 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 6106. Firearms not to be carried without a license.(a) Offense defined.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), any person who carries a firearm [in any vehicle or any person who carries a firearm] concealed on or about his person, except in his place of abode, within a vehicle or in a fixed place of business, without a valid and lawfully issued license under this chapter commits a felony of the third degree.123456789101112131415161718 (2) A person who is otherwise eligible to possess a valid license under this chapter but [carries a firearm in any vehicle or any person who] carries a firearm concealed on or about his person, except in his place of abode, within a vehicle or in a fixed place of business, without a valid and lawfully issued license and has not committed any other criminal violation commits a misdemeanor of the first degree.(b) Exceptions.--The provisions of subsection (a) shall not apply to:* * *[(11) Any person while carrying a firearm in any vehicle, which person possesses a valid and lawfully issued license for that firearm which has been issued under the laws of the United States or any other state.]* * *[(13) Any person who is otherwise eligible to possess a firearm under this chapter and who is operating a motor vehicle which is registered in the person's name or the name of a spouse or parent and which contains a firearm for which a valid license has been issued pursuant to section 6109 to the spouse or parent owning the firearm.]* * *§ 6109. Licenses.(a) Purpose of license.--A license to carry a firearm shall be for the purpose of carrying a firearm concealed on or about one's person [or in a vehicle] throughout this Commonwealth.(b) Place of application.--An individual who is 21 years of age or older may apply to a sheriff for a license to carry a firearm concealed on or about his person [or in a vehicle] within this Commonwealth. If the applicant is a resident of this 20260HB2599PN3520 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth, he shall make application with the sheriff of the county in which he resides or, if a resident of a city of the first class, with the chief of police of that city.* * *§ 6122. Proof of license and exception.(a) General rule.--When carrying a firearm concealed on or about one's person [or in a vehicle], an individual licensed to carry a firearm shall, upon lawful demand of a law enforcement officer, produce the license for inspection. Failure to produce such license either at the time of arrest or at the preliminary hearing shall create a rebuttable presumption of nonlicensure.(b) Exception.--An individual carrying a firearm on or about his person [or in a vehicle] and claiming an exception under section 6106(b) (relating to firearms not to be carried without a license) shall, upon lawful demand of a law enforcement officer, produce satisfactory evidence of qualification for exception.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2599PN3520 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718